Wisconsin, session 2025, SB380.
do enact as follows:SB380,11Section 1. 939.44 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB380,2,72939.44 (3) Provocation is not adequate under this section if it resulted from 3the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim’s actual or 4perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, 5including under circumstances in which the victim made a romantic or sexual 6advance without use or threat of force or violence towards the defendant or in which 7the defendant and victim dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.SB380,28Section 2. 939.48 (5m) of the statutes is created to read:SB380,3,39939.48 (5m) A person is not entitled to claim the privilege of self-defense 10based on the discovery of, knowledge about, or potential disclosure of the victim’s 11actual or perceived gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual 1orientation, including under circumstances in which the victim made a romantic or 2sexual advance without use or threat of force or violence towards the person or in 3which the person and victim dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.SB380,34Section 3. 971.15 (2) of the statutes is renumbered 971.15 (2) (intro.) and 5amended to read:SB380,3,76971.15 (2) (intro.) As used in this chapter, the terms “mental disease or 7defect” do not include an any of the following:SB380,3,98(a) An abnormality manifested only by repeated criminal or otherwise 9antisocial conduct.SB380,410Section 4. 971.15 (2) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB380,3,1611971.15 (2) (b) A state brought on by or resulting from the discovery of, 12knowledge about, or potential disclosure of an individual’s actual or perceived 13gender, gender identity, gender expression, or sexual orientation, including under 14circumstances in which an individual made a romantic or sexual advance without 15use or threat of force or violence towards the actor or in which the actor and the 16individual dated or had a romantic or sexual relationship.SB380,517Section 5. Initial applicability.SB380,3,1918(1) This act first applies to offenses committed on the effective date of this 19subsection.SB380,3,2020